Illinois, session 104th, SB4173.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. Findings; grants.5  (a) The General Assembly finds all the following:6    (1) A strong research base supports the fact that 7afterschool programs and community schools improve academic 8achievement, support social and emotional growth, help keep 9communities safe, and support the needs of working families. 10    (2) Data supports the fact that there is always a greater 11need for these programs than there is funding for programming. 12    (3) Students and families in all communities should have 13access to these services regardless of income status. 14    (4) Illinois as a nationwide leader in child development 15recognizes that we must move toward an education system that 16provides afterschool for all. 17  (b) The State Board of Education shall make grants 18available for community learning centers separate and apart 19from any federal appropriations.20    (1) The purpose of community learning center programs is 21to provide opportunities to establish or expand activities 22that:23      (A) provide opportunities for academic enrichment, 24including providing tutorial services to help students   SB4173- 2 -LRB104 21110 LNS 35297 b1(particularly students who attend low-performing schools), to 2meet the challenging State academic standards;3      (B) offer students a broad array of additional services, 4programs, and activities, such as youth development 5activities, service learning, nutrition and health education, 6drug and violence prevention programs, counseling programs, 7art, music, physical fitness, and wellness programs, 8technology education programs, financial literacy programs, 9environmental literacy programs, mathematics, science, and 10career and technical education programs, internship or 11apprenticeship programs, and other ties to an in-demand 12industry sector or occupation for high school students that 13are designed to reinforce and complement the regular academic 14program of participating students; 15      (C) offer families of students served by community 16learning centers opportunities for active and meaningful 17engagement in their children's education, including 18opportunities for literacy and related educational 19development; and 20      (D) support the whole needs of students, including 21providing extended learning time, integrated student support, 22family engagement, and collaborative leadership structures in 23schools as part of the community schools model, as a 24research-validated strategy to promote equity in education.25    (2) Public and private entities, including local education 26agencies, such as public school districts, public university   SB4173- 3 -LRB104 21110 LNS 35297 b1laboratory schools approved by the State Board of Education, 2State-authorized charter schools, area vocational centers, 3regional offices of education, intermediate service centers, 4community-based organizations, including faith-based 5organizations, Indian tribes or tribal organizations, as 6defined in the federal Indian Self-Determination and Education 7Assistance Act, and other public and private entities or a 8consortium of 2 or more such agencies, organizations, or 9entities are eligible to apply.10    (3) Each grantee must propose to serve high-poverty 11schools or schools eligible for schoolwide programs under 12Section 1114 of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education 13Act, as amended by the Every Student Succeeds Act, such as 14schools in which not less than 40% of the children are from 15low-income families.16    (4) Individual awards should not exceed $225,000 per site, 17such as the physical location where grant-funded services and 18activities are provided to participating students and adults.19    (5) Successful applicants may reapply via continuing 20application for up to 4 additional years. Funding in 21subsequent years is contingent upon compliance with federal 22and State law, State grant-making rules, passage of sufficient 23appropriations for the program, and satisfactory performance 24in the preceding grant period.25    (6) The State Board of Education shall issue a grant 26application to select a technical assistance provider to   SB4173- 4 -LRB104 21110 LNS 35297 b1support grantees. Grantees must participate in compliance and 2technical assistance activities. This technical assistance 3provider must also develop an advisory board of grantees to 4provide feedback to the State Board of Education on the 5feasibility of grant management practices and the needs of 6students. 7    (7) The program objectives of this grant are as follows: 8      (A) Schools will improve student achievement in core 9academic areas. 10      (B) Schools will show an increase in student attendance 11and graduation from high school. 12      (C) Schools will see an increase in the social-emotional 13skills of their students. 14      (D) Programs will collaborate with the community. 15      (E) Programs will coordinate with schools to determine 16the students and families with the greatest need. 17      (F) Programs will provide ongoing professional 18development to program personnel. 19      (G) Programs will collaborate with schools and 20community-based organizations to provide sustainable programs.21  Elements of the community school's model can be offered by 22community learning centers.23  The State Board of Education must provide public reports 24annually on the spending of this programming and plans for 25future competitions.26  The State Board of Education must issue continuing   SB4173- 5 -LRB104 21110 LNS 35297 b1application materials annually within 30 days of the start of 2the fiscal year. 3  The State Board of Education must name a technical 4assistance provider to support these grantees. 5    Section 10. The amount of $50,000,000, or so much of that 6amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 7Revenue Fund to the State Board of Education for the purpose of 8providing grants for community learning centers to support 9afterschool programs and community schools. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.